Mississippi, session 20251E, HB10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is authorized and approved for expenditure out of any funds which are received by or otherwise become available to the Pat Harrison Waterway District, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the district for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026......................................... $ 7,764,319.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds approved for expenditure under the provisions of Section 1, the following positions are authorized: AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:           42 Time-Limited:         0 Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions and procedures established by law. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 3.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Pat Harrison Waterway District shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 5.  The funds herein approved for expenditure, except and less an amount approved by the State Fiscal Officer which shall be sufficient to cover disbursements for current operations, shall be deposited at interest with any official depository of the state at a rate of interest numerically not less than one percent (1%) below the bank discount rate on United States Treasury bills of comparable maturity as determined by the State Treasurer. SECTION 6.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, Seven Hundred Thousand Dollars ($700,000.00) is authorized to be expended to defray the cost of park facilities repairs only.  These repairs are to include bath houses and cabins and to exclude any Flint Creek Horse Trail repairs. SECTION 7.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, Four Hundred Eighty Thousand Dollars ($480,000.00) is authorized to be expended to defray the cost of dam repairs. SECTION 8.  The Pat Harrison Waterway District shall provide a report on completed park facilities repairs.  This report shall be provided to the Legislature by December 1, 2025, and shall include photos of stated repairs. The Pat Harrison Waterway District shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a copy of this report with the subsequent fiscal year's budget submission. SECTION 9.  The Pat Harrison Waterway District shall provide an annual five-year plan containing a prioritized list detailing the purposes, goals and projected costs of projects which it intends to implement or is in the process of implementing.  This report shall be provided to the Legislature on or before July 15 of each year as required in Section 51-15-119(2).  The Pat Harrison Waterway District shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a copy of this report with the current year's budget submission. SECTION 10. The Pat Harrison Waterway District shall provide an annual audit of the district operations.  This report shall be provided to the Legislature as required in Section 51-15-119(3).  The Pat Harrison Waterway District shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a copy of this report with the current year's budget submission. SECTION 11.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 12.  The money herein approved for expenditure shall be disbursed upon bank checks signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 13.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.